Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-500 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Protecting
Oklahoma’s Children on Social Media Act of 2025”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-501 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. “Acceptable-use policy” means a policy for Internet use
adopted by a public school district board of education or charter
school governing body that meets the requirements of this section;
2. “Account holder” means a person who is a resident of this
state and has an account or profile to use a social media platform;
3. “Child pornography” means any visual depiction including any
live performance, photograph, film, video, picture, or computer or
computer-generated image or picture, whether made or produced by
electronic, mechanical, or other means, of sexually explicit conduct
when:
a. the production of the visual depiction involves a
minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct,
b. the visual depiction is of a minor engaging in
sexually explicit conduct, or
c. the visual depiction has been created, adapted, or
modified to appear that an identifiable minor is
engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
4. “Harmful to minors” means that quality of description or
representation, in whatever form, of nudity, sexual conduct, sexual
excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse, when:
a. taken as a whole, it predominantly appeals to the
prurient, shameful, or morbid interest of minors,


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. it is patently offensive to prevailing standards in
the adult community as a whole with respect to what is
suitable material for minors, and
c. taken as a whole, it is lacking in serious literary,
artistic, political, or scientific value for minors;
5. “Identifiable minor” means a person:
a. (1) who was a minor at the time the visual depiction
was created, adapted, or modified, or
(2) whose image as a minor was used in creating,
adapting, or modifying the visual depiction, and
b. who is recognizable as an actual person by such
person’s face, likeness, or other distinguishing
physical characteristic or other recognizable physical
feature;
6. “Minor” means any individual under the age of eighteen (18)
years;
7. “Obscene material” means material which meets the following
requirements:
a. to the average person, applying contemporary community
standards, taken as a whole, the material
predominantly appeals or panders to prurient interest
in nudity, sex, or excretion,


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. the material, taken as a whole, lacks serious
literary, artistic, political, or scientific value,
and
c. the material depicts or describes in a patently
offensive way sexual conduct as follows:
(1) acts of sexual intercourse, heterosexual or
homosexual, normal or perverted, actual or
simulated,
(2) acts of masturbation,
(3) acts involving excretory functions or lewd
exhibition of the genitals,
(4) acts of bestiality or the fondling of sex organs
of animals, or
(5) sexual acts of flagellation, torture, or other
violence indicating a sadomasochistic sexual
relationship;
8. “Parent” means a natural or adoptive parent, legal guardian,
or a person who has legal authority to act on behalf of a minor
child;
9. “School equipment” means any computer or computer networking
equipment, technology or technology-related device or service, or
communication system or service that is operated, owned, leased, and
made available to students by a public school district board of
education or charter school governing body and that is used for
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

tran smitting, receiving, accessing, viewing, hearing, downloading,
recording, or storing electronic communication;
10. “Social media platform” means an online forum that allows
an account holder to create a profile, upload posts, view and listen
to posts, form mutual connections, and interact publicly and
privately with other account holders and users. Such term shall not
include an online service, website, or application where the
predominant or exclusive function is any of the following:
a. email,
b. a service that, pursuant to its terms of use, does not
permit minors to use the platform and utilizes
commercially reasonable age assurance mechanisms to
deter minors from becoming account holders,
c. a streaming service that provides only licensed media
that is not user-generated in a continuous flow from
the service, website, or application to the end user
and does not obtain a license to the media from a user
or account holder by agreement to its terms of
service,
d. news, sports, entertainment, or other content that is
preselected by the provider and not user-generated,
and any chat, comment, or interactive functionality
that is provided incidental to or directly or
indirectly related to such content,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

e. online shopping or e-commerce, if the interaction with
other users or account holders is generally limited to
the ability to upload a post and comment on reviews,
the ability to display lists or collections of goods
for sale or wish lists, and other functions that are
focused on online shopping or e-commerce rather than
interaction between users or account holders,
f. interactive gaming, virtual gaming, or an online
service, website, or application that allows the
creation and uploading of content for the purpose of
interactive gaming, educational entertainment, or
associated entertainment, and communications related
to that content,
g. photograph editing that has an associated photograph
hosting service if the interaction with other users or
account holders is generally limited to liking or
commenting,
h. single-purpose community groups for public safety if
the interaction with other users or account holders is
limited to that single purpose and the community group
has guidelines or policies against illegal content,
i. business-to-business software,


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

j. teleconferencing or videoconferencing services that
allow reception and transmission of audio and video
signals for real-time communication,
k. cloud storage,
l. shared document collaboration,
m. cloud computing services, which may include cloud
storage and shared document collaboration,
n. providing access to or interacting with data
visualization platforms, libraries, or hubs,
o. permitting comments on a digital news website if the
news content is posted only by the provider of the
digital news website,
p. providing or obtaining technical support for a
platform, product, or service,
q. academic, scholarly, or genealogical research where
the majority of the content is created or posted by
the provider of the online service, website, or
application and the ability to chat, comment, or
interact with other users is directly related to the
provider’s content,
r. Internet access and broadband service,
s. a classified advertising service in which the provider
of the online service, website, or application is
limited to all of the following:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(1) permitting only the sale of goods,
(2) prohibiting the solicitation of personal
services,
(3) posting or creating a substantial amount of the
content, and
(4) providing the ability to chat, comment, or
interact with other users only if it is directly
related to the provider’s content,
t. an online service, website, or application that is
used by or under the direction of a public school
district or charter school in this state including a
learning management system, student engagement
program, or subject- or skill-specific program where
the majority of the content is created or posted by
the provider of the online service, website, or
application and the ability to chat, comment, or
interact with other users is directly related to the
provider’s content,
u. peer-to-peer payments, provided that interactions
among users or account holders are generally limited
to the ability to send, receive, or request funds;
like or comment on such transactions; or other
functions related to sending, receiving, requesting,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or settling payments among users or account holders,
or
v. career development opportunities including
professional networking, job skills, learning
certifications, and job posting and application
services;
11. “Technology protection measure” means a technology that
inspects and analyzes unencrypted Internet traffic for malware and
that blocks or filters electronic access to obscene materials, child
pornography, or material that is harmful to minors; and
12. “User” means a person who has access to view all or some of
the posts on a social media platform but who is not an account
holder.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-502 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. The State Department of Education shall develop model
programs for educating students regarding online safety while using
the Internet, taking into consideration educational materials on
this topic developed by other states as well as any other materials
suggested by education experts, child psychologists, and technology
companies that promote child online safety issues.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The model programs provided for in this section shall
include one or more model programs for students in grades six
through twelve which:
a. shall include instruction regarding:
(1) the social, emotional, and physical effects of
social media on users,
(2) the effects of social media on the mental health
of users, particularly teenagers,
(3) the distribution of disinformation and
misinformation on social media,
(4) how social media influences thoughts and
behaviors,
(5) the permanency and risks of sharing materials
online,
(6) how to maintain personal security and identify
cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human
trafficking on the Internet and social media, and
(7) how to report suspicious behavior encountered on
the Internet and social media to appropriate
persons and authorities, and
b. may include information regarding the benefits of
social media use, such as supporting career readiness
for future academic or employment opportunities,
sharing information with familiar family and friends,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and safely connecting with other users with similar
interests.
B. The State Department of Education shall periodically update
the model programs provided for in this section to reflect changes
in Internet and social media use, emergent technologies, social and
psychological research, and information concerning new threats to
teenagers and young adults using social media platforms and other
online communication technologies.
C. The State Department of Education shall publish on its
website information relating to the model programs provided for in
this section including recommended curricula and instructional
materials as updated periodically as provided in this section. The
Department shall provide technical assistance in addition to such
model programs and recommended curricula and instructional materials
to aid any public school district board of education or charter
school governing body that may elect to incorporate one or more
components of Internet and social media safety into its
instructional program.
D. Each public school district board of education or charter
school governing body may incorporate into its instructional program
a component on online Internet safety including social media safety
to be taught on a schedule as determined by the public school
district board of education or charter school governing body.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-503 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No later than October 1, 2025, each public school district
board of education or charter school governing body shall adopt an
acceptable-use policy. At a minimum, an acceptable-use policy shall
contain provisions which are reasonably designed to:
1. Prevent and prohibit any school equipment from being used
for accessing, sending, receiving, viewing, or downloading obscene
materials, child pornography, or material that is harmful to minors;
2. Establish appropriate measures to be taken by the public
school district or charter school in response to:
a. students and school employees who intentionally
violate the acceptable-use policy, regardless of
whether such student or school employee was, at the
time of such violation, on school property, on a
school bus or other school vehicle, at a school-
related function, or elsewhere, provided that such
measures include disciplinary measures, and
b. any person who is not a student or school employee who
violates the acceptable-use policy, regardless of
whether such person was, at the time of such
violation, on school property, on a school bus or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

other school vehicle, at a school-related function, or
elsewhere;
3. Provide for administrative procedures to enforce the
acceptable-use policy;
4. Provide for administrative procedures to address complaints
regarding possible violations of the acceptable-use policy which, at
a minimum, require that each complaint is responded to in writing by
an appropriate public school district or charter school official;
and
5. Provide for expedited review and resolution of a claim that
the application of the acceptable-use policy is denying a student or
school employee access to material that is not within the
prohibitions of the acceptable-use policy.
B. The acceptable-use policy provided for in subsection A of
this section may include terms, conditions, and requirements deemed
appropriate by the public school district board of education or
charter school governing body to differentiate acceptable uses among
elementary, middle, and high school students and among different age
groups; provided, however, that any public school district board of
education or charter school governing body that authorizes such
differentiation shall articulate in its acceptable-use policy the
rationale for each method of differentiation included in such
acceptable-use policy.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Each public school district board of education or charter
school governing body shall provide reasonable opportunities and
procedures for parents of current students to confer and collaborate
with school administrators and teachers regarding appropriate
Internet access for such students.
D. Each public school district board of education or charter
school governing body and school district superintendent or charter
school administrator shall take such steps as are necessary and
appropriate to implement and enforce the acceptable-use policy,
which shall include, but not be limited to, providing for the
adoption, use, and routine upgrading of technology protection
measures which meet or exceed compliance standards and
specifications established by the State Department of Education.
E. Each public school district and charter school shall
provide, upon written request of a parent, a copy of the acceptable-
use policy adopted pursuant to subsection B of this section and
information regarding the administrative procedures in effect to
enforce the acceptable-use policy and to address complaints about
enforcement.
F. By October 15, 2025, and each October 15 thereafter, each
public school district board of education or charter school
governing body shall electronically submit a copy of its acceptable-
use policy to the State Board of Education. The submission shall
include the identification of the technology protection measures
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

bein g used, if such measures are being used as provided for in
Section 5 of this act.
G. The State Board of Education shall review each acceptable-
use policy and any subsequent revisions submitted pursuant to
subsection H of this section. If the Board determines after review
that a policy, technology protection measure, or revision is not
reasonably designed to achieve the requirements of this section, the
Board shall provide written notice to the public school district
board of education or charter school governing body explaining the
nature of such noncompliance, and the public school district board
of education or charter school governing body shall have thirty (30)
days from the receipt of written notice to correct such
noncompliance. The Board may provide an extension to the thirty-day
period on a showing of good cause.
H. No revision of an acceptable-use policy submission which has
been approved by the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection
G of this section shall be implemented until such revision is
approved by the Board. If the Board fails to disapprove the
revision within sixty (60) days after the submission is received,
the public school district board of education or charter school
governing body may proceed with the implementation of the revision.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-504 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

A. By April 1, 2026, and by each April 1 thereafter, the State
Department of Education shall establish compliance standards and
specifications for technology protection measures that may be used
by public school districts and charter schools in this state. To
the extent practicable, such compliance standards and specifications
for technology protection measures shall include measures and
controls for parents of current students to supervise and manage
appropriate Internet access by such students who are using a school-
issued computer or other electronic device while not on school
property, not on a school bus or other school vehicle, or not at a
school-related function.
B. The State Department of Education shall publish on its
website a list of technology protection measures that meet the
compliance standards and specifications established pursuant to
subsection A of this section that public school districts and
charter schools may install on each computer or other electronic
device issued to students for off-campus use. The Department shall
annually require each technology protection measure provider to
verify that the measures it provides meet or exceed the standards
and specifications established pursuant to subsection A of this
section. The Department may provide information to public school
districts and charter schools regarding state contracts with
technology protection measure providers. The Department shall
prioritize the identification of technology protection measure
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov iders that include parental measures and controls as provided
for in this section.
C. The Department shall provide guidance and technical
assistance to assist public school districts and charter schools in
complying with this section.
D. By December 1, 2025, the Department shall develop guidelines
for the training of public school district and charter school
personnel. The training guidelines shall include instruction in:
1. Implementing and complying with acceptable-use policies
required by Section 4 of this act;
2. Basic cybersecurity issues pertinent to public school
districts and charter schools, students, and educators including,
but not limited to, phishing and multifactor authentication; and
3. Other current and emerging issues and topics which address
the safe and secure use of technology by students and educators.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-505 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. By April 1, 2026, each public school district board of
education or charter school governing body shall adopt a social
media policy which shall:
1. a. except as provided in subparagraph b of this
paragraph, prohibit students from accessing social
media platforms through the use of computer equipment,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

communications services, or Internet access that is
operated, owned, leased, and made available to
students by the public school district or charter
school or the public school district board of
education or charter school governing body, and
b. to the extent authorized by such social media policy,
students shall be permitted to access social media
platforms only:
(1) as directed by school personnel,
(2) for the exclusive purpose of accessing and
utilizing age-appropriate educational resources,
(3) under the supervision of such school personnel,
and
(4) during the course of a school-related activity;
2. Establish appropriate measures to be taken when a student
violates such policy; and
3. Establish procedures for parents to:
a. request information from school personnel about what
social media platforms have been or are intended to be
accessed as provided in subparagraph b of paragraph 1
of this subsection, and
b. prohibit their child from accessing one or more social
media platforms as provided in subparagraph b of
paragraph 1 of this subsection.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. A public school district board of education or charter
school governing body shall take such steps as it deems appropriate
to implement and enforce its social media policy, which shall
include, but shall not be limited to:
1. Use of software programs and other technologies reasonably
designed and intended to block and monitor access to social media
platforms; and
2. Selection of online servers that block and monitor access to
social media platforms.
C. Each public school district and charter school shall publish
on its website a copy of the social media policy adopted pursuant to
this section and shall provide a paper copy upon written request of
a parent of an enrolled student.
D. The State Department of Education may consult with and
assist a public school district board of education or charter school
governing body in developing and implementing a social media policy
pursuant to this section.
E. By April 15, 2026, each public school district board of
education or charter school governing body shall electronically
submit a copy of its social media policy to the State Department of
Education for compliance review. Such submission shall identify any
software program or other technology that is being or will be
utilized to block access to social media platforms in accordance
with subsection B of this section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. The State Department of Education shall review each social
media policy and any subsequent revisions electronically submitted
pursuant to subsection E of this section. If the Department
determines after compliance review that a policy or revision thereof
is not reasonably designed to achieve the requirements of this
section, it shall provide written notice of noncompliance to the
public school district board of education or charter school
governing body as provided for in subsection H of this section.
G. No revision of a social media policy which has been deemed
compliant pursuant to subsection H of this section shall be
implemented until such revision is reviewed by the State Department
of Education. If the Department fails to provide a notice of
noncompliance for the revision within sixty (60) days of its
receipt, the public school district board of education or charter
school governing body may proceed with the implementation of the
revision.
H. 1. The State Department of Education shall be responsible
for conducting any necessary investigations and making written
determinations as to whether a public school district board of
education or charter school governing body has failed to comply with
the requirements of this section.
2. If the Department determines that a public school district
board of education or charter school governing body has failed to
comply with the requirements of this section, it shall provide a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

writ ten notice of noncompliance to the board of education or charter
school governing body and the board or governing body shall have
thirty (30) days from the receipt of such notice to correct such
noncompliance and to develop a corrective action plan for preventing
future recurrences. The Department may extend such thirty-day
period upon a showing of good cause by the local governing body.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
April 17, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1388 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)